Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 5
Trust Protector

§ 15-7-501. Trust protector.

Definition of terms:

“Distribution trust advisor” means a person given authority by the trust instrument to exercise all or any portions of the powers and discretions set forth in subsection (11) of this section.

“Excluded fiduciary” means any fiduciary excluded from exercising certain powers under the instrument, which powers may be exercised by the grantor or a trust advisor or a trust protector.

“Fiduciary” means a trustee under any testamentary or other trust, an executor, administrator, or personal representative of a decedent’s estate, or any other party, including a trust advisor or a trust protector, who is acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust or estate.

“Instrument” means any revocable or irrevocable trust document whether created inter vivos or testamentary.

“Investment trust advisor” means a person given authority by the trust instrument to exercise all or any portions of the powers and discretions set forth in subsection (10) of this section.

“Trust advisor” means a distribution trust advisor or an investment advisor.

“Trust protector” means any disinterested third party whose appointment is provided for in the trust instrument.

Liability limits of excluded fiduciary. An excluded fiduciary is not liable, either individually or as a fiduciary, for either of the following:

Any loss that results from compliance with a direction of the trust advisor;

Any loss that results from a failure to take any action proposed by an excluded fiduciary that requires a prior authorization of the trust advisor if that excluded fiduciary timely sought but failed to obtain that authorization.

Death of grantor. An excluded fiduciary may continue to follow the direction of the trust advisor upon the incapacity or death of the grantor if the instrument so allows.

When trust advisor considered as fiduciary. If one (1) or more trust advisors are given authority by the terms of a governing instrument to direct, consent to, or disapprove a fiduciary’s investment decisions, or proposed investment decisions, such trust advisors shall be considered to be fiduciaries when exercising such authority unless the governing instrument provides otherwise.

Excluded fiduciary’s liability for loss if trust protector appointed. If an instrument appoints a trust protector, the excluded fiduciary is not liable for any loss resulting from any action taken upon such trust protector’s direction.
(6) Powers and discretions of trust protector. The powers and discretions of a trust protector shall be as provided in the governing instrument and may, in the best interests of the trust, be exercised or not exercised in the sole and absolute discretion of the trust protector and shall be binding on all other persons. Such powers and discretion may include the following:

To modify or amend the trust instrument to achieve favorable tax status or because of changes in the Internal Revenue Code, state law, or the rulings and regulations thereunder;

To increase or decrease the interests of any beneficiaries to the trust;

To modify the terms of any power of appointment granted by the trust. However, a modification or amendment may not grant a beneficial interest to any individual or class of individuals not specifically provided for under the trust instrument;

To terminate the trust;

To veto or direct trust distributions;

To change situs or governing law of the trust, or both;

To appoint a successor trust protector;

To interpret terms of the trust instrument at the request of the trustee;

To advise the trustee on matters concerning a beneficiary; and

To amend or modify the trust instrument to take advantage of laws governing restraints on alienation, distribution of trust property, or the administration of the trust.

Any excluded fiduciary is also relieved from any obligation to perform investment reviews and make recommendations with respect to any investments to the extent the trust advisor had authority to direct the acquisition, disposition or retention of any such investment.

(7) Submission to court jurisdiction — Effect on trust advisor or trust protector. By accepting an appointment to serve as a trust advisor or trust protector of a trust that is subject to the laws of this state, the trust advisor or the trust protector submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of Idaho even if investment advisory agreements or other related agreements provide otherwise, and the trust advisor or trust protector may be made a party to any action or proceeding if issues relate to a decision or action of the trust advisor or trust protector.

(8) Powers of trust protector incorporated by reference in will or trust instrument. Any of the powers enumerated in subsection (6) of this section, as they exist at the time of the signing of a will by a testator or testatrix or at the time of the signing of a trust instrument by a trustor may be, by appropriate reference made thereto, incorporated in whole or in part in such will or trust instrument by a clearly expressed intention of a testator or testatrix of a will or trustor of a trust instrument.

(9) Investment trust advisor or distribution trust advisor provided for in trust instrument. A trust instrument governed by the laws of Idaho may provide for a person to act as an investment trust advisor or a distribution trust advisor, respectively, with regard to investment decisions or discretionary distributions.

(10) Powers and discretions of investment trust advisor. The powers and discretions of an investment trust advisor shall be provided in the trust instrument and may be exercised or not exercised, in the best interests of the trust, in the sole and absolute discretion of the investment trust advisor and are binding on any other person and any other interested party, fiduciary, and excluded fiduciary. Unless the terms of the document provide otherwise, the investment trust advisor has the power to perform the following:

(a) Direct the trustee with respect to the retention, purchase, sale or encumbrance of trust property and the investment and reinvestment of principal and income of the trust;

(b) Vote proxies for securities held in trust; and

(c) Select one (1) or more investment advisors, managers or counselors, including the trustee, and delegate to them any of its powers.
(11) Powers and discretions of distribution trust advisor. The powers and discretions of a distribution trust advisor shall be provided in the trust instrument and may be exercised or not exercised, in the best interests of the trust, in the sole and absolute discretion of the distribution trust advisor and are binding on any other person and any other interested party, fiduciary, and excluded fiduciary. Unless the terms of the document provide otherwise, the distribution trust advisor shall direct the trustee with regard to all discretionary distributions to beneficiaries.

§ 15-7-502. Spendthrift trusts.

A settlor may provide in the terms of the trust that the interest of a beneficiary in the income or in the principal or in both may not be voluntarily or involuntarily transferred before payment or delivery of the interest to the beneficiary by the trustee.

A declaration in a trust instrument that the interest of a beneficiary shall be held subject to a “spendthrift trust” is sufficient to restrain voluntary or involuntary alienation of the interest by a beneficiary to the maximum extent permitted under this section.

Validity of a restraint on transfer in a trust document shall not require specific reference to or identical verbiage set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

If a person is both a settlor and beneficiary of the same trust, a provision restraining the voluntary or involuntary transfer of the settlor’s beneficial interest in such trust does not prevent the settlor’s creditors from satisfying claims from the settlor’s interest in the trust estate that relates to the portion of the trust that was contributed by the settlor. For the purposes of this subsection, however, a settlor shall not be considered to be a beneficiary of an irrevocable trust created by the settlor and taxed for federal income tax purposes pursuant to the grantor trust rules of the Internal Revenue Code, sections 671 through 679, inclusive, if the settlor’s only beneficial interest in such trust consists of the right to receive a distribution from such trust in an amount equal to or less than the amount of the federal and state income tax liability incurred by the settlor as a result of such trust being characterized as a grantor trust pursuant to the aforementioned grantor trust rules.

A beneficiary of a trust shall not be considered a settlor of a trust merely because of a lapse, waiver or release of:

A power described in subsection (6) of this section; or

The beneficiary’s right to withdraw a part of the trust property to the extent that the value of the property affected by the lapse, waiver or release in any calendar year does not exceed the greater of the amount specified in:

Section 2041(b)(2) or 2514(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or

Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

A beneficiary of a trust shall not be considered a settlor, to have made a voluntary or involuntary transfer of the beneficiary’s interest in a trust, or to have the power to make a voluntary or involuntary transfer of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust, merely because the beneficiary, in any capacity including, but not limited to, as a trustee, holds or exercises:

A presently exercisable power to:

Consume, invade, appropriate or distribute property to or for the benefit of the beneficiary, if the power is either exercisable only on consent of another person holding an interest adverse to the beneficiary’s interest or limited by an ascertainable standard including, but not limited to, health, education, support or maintenance of the beneficiary; or

Exercise a limited power of appointment, as defined in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, including, but not limited to, the power to appoint any property of the trust to or for the benefit of a person other than the beneficiary, a creditor of the beneficiary, the beneficiary’s estate, or a creditor of the beneficiary’s estate;

A testamentary power of appointment; or